New York, session 2025-2026, A1581.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 7-131 2 to read as follows: 3 § 7-131. Ballots; public release of ballot images. Following an 4 election, the board of elections shall publicly release and make avail- 5 able online, images of all ballots, excluding all personal identifying 6 information. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00200-01-5